Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-162
Domestic insurer; transfer of domicile; effect.

Any domestic insurer may, upon the approval of the Director of Insurance, transfer its domicile to any other state in which it is admitted to transact the business of insurance. Upon such a transfer, the domestic insurer shall cease to be a domestic insurer and shall be admitted to this state if qualified as a foreign insurer. The Director of Insurance shall approve any such proposed transfer unless he or she determines such transfer is not in the interest of the policyholders of this state.

Laws 1989, LB 61, § 2.